Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Article 3. Diversion of Streams

§ 940.
Diversion.

When it appears necessary to protect a highway damaged by or expected to be damaged by flood waters or ice jams, the selectboard may change the course of or widen a stream, or provide storage for accumulated ice, and for these purposes may purchase or take the necessary land.
It shall follow the procedures established in section 923 of this title in giving notice, inspecting property, determining need, awarding damages, and satisfying appeals.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 941.
Limitation.

Section 940 of this title shall not authorize the diversion of a stream, so that the value of a mill, manufactory, or machinery propelled by the water of the stream is diminished, without the consent of all interested persons.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.